Maryland, session 2025, HB1126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
8–311.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE CHILD SUPPORT
ARREARAGE TO WORK PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A CHILD SUPPORT ARREARAGE TO WORK PILOT PROGRAM
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO CONNECT INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
UNEMPLOYED AND IN ARREARS UNDER A CHILD SUPPORT ORDER WITH
EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES IN THE STATE, INCLUDING EMPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITIES IN STATE GOVERNMENT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN SERVICES AND THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, SHALL:
(1) IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 579 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) ESTABLISH THE PROCEDURES AND SAFEGUARDS NECESSARY TO
SECURELY SHARE INFORMATION RELATED TO THE PROGRAM AND PARTICIPANTS IN
THE PROGRAM.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
(F) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, ON THE DEPARTMENT’S FINDINGS AND ANY
RECOMMENDATIONS RELATED TO THE CONTINUATION OF THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –